Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 1 MOTOR VEHICLE DEALERS
44-20-121. Licenses - grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation.

A manufacturer's or distributor's license may be denied, suspended, or revoked on the following grounds:

Material misstatement in an application for a license;

Willful failure to comply with this part 1 or any rule promulgated by the executive director;

Engaging, in the past or present, in any illegal business practice.

A manufacturer representative's license may be denied, suspended, or revoked on the following grounds:

Material misstatement in an application for a license;

Willful failure to comply with any provision of this part 1 or any rule promulgated by the executive director under this part 1;

Having indulged in any unconscionable business practice pursuant to title 4;

Having coerced or attempted to coerce any motor vehicle dealer to accept delivery of any motor vehicle, parts or accessories therefor, or any other commodities or services that have not been ordered by the dealer;

Having coerced or attempted to coerce any motor vehicle dealer to enter into any agreement to do any act unfair to the dealer by threatening to cause the cancellation of the franchise of the dealer;

Having withheld, threatened to withhold, reduced, or delayed without just cause an order for motor vehicles, parts or accessories therefor, or any other commodities or services that have been ordered by a motor vehicle dealer;

Engaging, in the past or present, in any illegal business practice.

A motor vehicle dealer's, wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer's, wholesaler's, buyer agent's, or used motor vehicle dealer's license may be denied, suspended, or revoked on the following grounds:

Material misstatement in an application for a license;

Violation of any of the terms and provisions of this part 1 or any rule promulgated by the board under this part 1;

Having been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to any felony, or any crime pursuant to article 3, 4, or 5 of title 18, or any like crime pursuant to federal law or the law of any other state. A certified copy of the judgment of conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction in any hearing held pursuant to this article 20.

Defrauding any buyer, seller, motor vehicle salesperson, or financial institution to the person's damage;

Intentional or negligent failure to perform any written agreement with any buyer or seller;

Failure or refusal to furnish and keep in force any bond required under this part 1;

Having made a fraudulent or illegal sale, transaction, or repossession;

Willful misrepresentation, circumvention, or concealment of or failure to disclose, through whatsoever subterfuge or device, any of the material particulars or the nature thereof required to be stated or furnished to the buyer;

Intentionally publishing or circulating any advertising that is misleading or inaccurate in any material particular or that misrepresents any of the products sold or furnished by a licensed dealer;

Knowingly purchasing, selling, or otherwise acquiring or disposing of a stolen motor vehicle;

For a motor vehicle dealer or used motor vehicle dealer, engaging in the business for which the dealer is licensed without at all times maintaining a principal place of business as required by this part 1 during reasonable business hours; except that the license of a motor vehicle dealer or used motor vehicle dealer is not subject to denial, suspension, or revocation for engaging in activities at locations away from the principal place of business as described in section 44-20-120 (2)(c);

Engaging in the business through employment of an unlicensed motor vehicle salesperson;

Willfully violating any state or federal law respecting commerce or motor vehicles, or any lawful rule respecting commerce or motor vehicles promulgated by any licensing or regulating authority pertaining to motor vehicles, under circumstances in which the act constituting the violation directly and necessarily involves commerce or motor vehicles;

Representing or selling as a new and unused motor vehicle any motor vehicle that the dealer or salesperson knows has been used and operated for demonstration purposes or which the dealer or salesperson knows is otherwise a used motor vehicle;

Violating any state or federal statute or regulation issued thereunder dealing with odometers;

Selling to a retail customer a motor vehicle that is not equipped or in proper condition and adjustment as required by part 2 of article 4 of title 42 unless the vehicle is sold as a tow away, not to be driven;

Committing a fraudulent insurance act pursuant to section 10-1-128;

Failure to give notice to a prospective buyer of the acceptance or rejection of a motor vehicle purchase order agreement within a reasonable time period, as determined by the board, when the licensee is working with the prospective buyer on a finance sale or a consignment sale;

Selling to a retail customer a motor vehicle that is not equipped with a properly functioning emission control system, as determined based on an enforcement action taken pursuant to sections 25-7-122 (1)(j) and 25-7-144, unless the ownership document associated with the motor vehicle is a salvage certificate of title, a nonrepairable title, or, if issued by another state, a similar document.

A wholesaler's or wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer's license may be denied, suspended, or revoked for the selling, leasing, or offering or attempting to negotiate the sale, lease, or exchange of an interest in motor vehicles by the wholesaler or wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer to persons other than motor vehicle dealers, used motor vehicle dealers, or other wholesalers or wholesale motor vehicle auction dealers.

The license of a motor vehicle dealer may be denied, revoked, suspended, or otherwise subject to discipline imposed under this part 1 if an owner is acting as a salesperson without a motor vehicle salesperson license and the owner commits any of the acts or omissions that subject a salesperson's license to denial, revocation, or suspension under subsection (6) of this section.

The license of a motor vehicle salesperson may be denied, revoked, or suspended on the following grounds:

Material misstatement in an application for a license;

Failure to comply with any provision of this part 1 or any rule promulgated by the board or executive director under this part 1;

Engaging in the business for which the licensee is licensed without having in force and effect a good and sufficient bond with corporate surety as provided in this part 1;

Intentionally publishing or circulating any advertising that is misleading or inaccurate in any material particular or that misrepresents any motor vehicle products sold or attempted to be sold by the salesperson;

Indulging in any fraudulent business practice;

Selling, offering, or attempting to negotiate the sale, exchange, or lease of motor vehicles for any motor vehicle dealer or used motor vehicle dealer for which the salesperson is not licensed; except that negotiation with a motor vehicle dealer for the sale, exchange, or lease of new and used motor vehicles, except those vehicles defined in section 42-1-102 (55) as motorcycles and section 33-14.5-101 (3) as off-highway vehicles, by a salesperson compensated for the negotiation by the used motor vehicle dealer for which the salesperson is licensed shall not be grounds for denial, revocation, or suspension;

Representing oneself as a salesperson for any motor vehicle dealer or used motor vehicle dealer when the salesperson is not so employed and licensed;

Having been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to any felony, or any crime pursuant to article 3, 4, or 5 of title 18, or any like crime pursuant to federal law or the law of any other state. A certified copy of the judgment of conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction in any hearing held pursuant to this article 20.

Having knowingly purchased, sold, or otherwise acquired or disposed of a stolen motor vehicle;

Employing an unlicensed motor vehicle salesperson;

Violating any state or federal statute or regulation issued thereunder dealing with odometers;

Defrauding any retail buyer to the person's damage;

Representing or selling as a new and unused motor vehicle any motor vehicle that the salesperson knows has been used and operated for demonstration purposes or that the salesperson knows is otherwise a used motor vehicle;

Selling to a retail customer a motor vehicle that is not equipped or in proper condition and adjustment as required by part 2 of article 4 of title 42 unless the vehicle is sold as a tow away, not to be driven;

Willfully violating any state or federal law respecting commerce or motor vehicles, or any lawful rule respecting commerce or motor vehicles promulgated by any licensing or regulating authority pertaining to motor vehicles, under circumstances in which the act constituting the violation directly and necessarily involves commerce or motor vehicles;

Improperly withholding, misappropriating, or converting to the salesperson's own use any money belonging to customers or other persons, received in the course of employment as a motor vehicle salesperson.

(6.5) A business disposal license may be denied, suspended, or revoked on the following grounds:

Making a material misstatement in an application for a license;

Violating this part 1 or a rule promulgated by the board under this part 1;

Having been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to a felony, a crime under article 3, 4, or 5 of title 18, or any like crime under federal law or the law of another state. A certified copy of the judgment of conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction is conclusive evidence of the conviction in a hearing held under this article 20.

Defrauding a buyer, seller, motor vehicle salesperson, or financial institution to the person's damage;

Intentional or negligent failure to perform any written agreement with a buyer or seller;

Making a fraudulent or illegal sale, transaction, or repossession;

Willful misrepresentation or circumvention of, concealment of, or failure to disclose any of the material particulars required to or the nature of any of the material particulars required to be stated or furnished to the buyer;

Intentionally publishing or circulating an advertisement that is misleading or inaccurate in any material particular or that misrepresents a product sold by or furnished by a licensed dealer;

Knowingly selling, acquiring, or disposing of a stolen motor vehicle;

Willfully violating a state or federal law governing commerce or motor vehicles or a rule governing commerce or motor vehicles promulgated by any licensing or regulating authority governing motor vehicles if the act constituting the violation directly and necessarily involves commerce or motor vehicles;

Representing or selling as new a motor vehicle that the dealer or salesperson knows:

Has been used for and operated for demonstration purposes; or

Is a used motor vehicle;

Violating a state or federal statute, rule, or regulation dealing with odometers;

Selling to a retail customer a motor vehicle that is not equipped as required by or in proper condition and adjustment as required by part 2 of article 4 of title 42 unless the vehicle is sold as a tow-away and not to be driven;

Committing a fraudulent insurance act under section 10-1-128;

Failing to notify a prospective buyer of the acceptance or rejection of a motor vehicle purchase order agreement within a reasonable period, as determined by the board, when the licensee is working with the prospective buyer on a finance sale or a consignment sale;

Failing to maintain in Colorado, when the business disposer is licensed, a place of business that:

Is maintained by the business disposer and is located at a fixed address, other than solely a post office box or an electronic address; and

Employs one or more individuals on a full-time basis.

Any license issued pursuant to this part 1 may be denied, revoked, or suspended if unfitness of the licensee or licensee applicant is shown in the following:

The licensing character or record of the licensee or licensee applicant;

The criminal character or record of the licensee or licensee applicant;

The financial character or record of the licensee or licensee applicant;

Violation of any lawful order of the board.

Any license issued or for which an application has been made pursuant to this part 1 shall be revoked or denied if the licensee or applicant has been convicted of or pleaded no contest to any of the following offenses in this state or any other jurisdiction during the previous ten years:

A felony in violation of article 3, 4, or 5 of title 18 or any similar crime under federal law or the law of any other state; or

A crime involving odometer fraud, salvage fraud, motor vehicle title fraud, or the defrauding of a retail consumer in a motor vehicle sale or lease transaction.

A certified copy of a judgment of conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction of an offense under subsection (8)(a) of this section is conclusive evidence of the conviction in any hearing held pursuant to this article 20.

In any disciplinary hearing, action, or order of the board involving a violation of section 42-6-112 or 42-6-119 (3), it is an affirmative defense that the dealer has taken every reasonable action necessary to deliver or facilitate the delivery of the certificate of title within thirty days. To qualify as having taken every reasonable action to deliver or facilitate the delivery of the certificate of title, the dealer must have, at a minimum:

Processed and mailed any required loan payoffs in a reasonable amount of time;

Contacted the prior lender and taken any actions necessary to obtain a certificate of title or duplicate certificate of title, either of which must be free of liens;

Taken any action necessary to obtain information or signatures from the prior owner necessary to have a new certificate of title issued for the motor vehicle;

Submitted all paperwork that the dealer has obtained to the authorized agent and that is necessary to have a new certificate of title issued for the motor vehicle; and

Corrected any errors in any filings with the department in a reasonable amount of time.

A person whose license issued under this part 1 is revoked or who surrenders a license to avoid discipline is ineligible to apply for a new license under this part 1 for one year after the date of revocation or surrender of the license.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 65, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(6.5) added, (SB 19-249), ch. 309, p. 2804, § 6, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

(3)(k) amended, (SB 22-223), ch. 406, p. 2880, § 2, effective August 10; (3)(s) added, (SB 22-179), ch. 485, p. 3527, § 8, effective August 10.

44-20-122. Procedure for denial, suspension, or revocation of license - judicial review.

The denial, suspension, or revocation of licenses issued under this part 1 shall be in accordance with the provisions of sections 24-4-104 and 24-4-105; except that the discovery available under rule 26 (b)(2) of the Colorado rules of civil procedure is available in any proceeding.

The board shall appoint an administrative law judge pursuant to part 10 of article 30 of title 24 to conduct any hearing concerning the licensing or discipline of a motor vehicle dealer, used motor vehicle dealer, wholesaler, buyer's agent, business disposer, or wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer; except that the board may, upon a unanimous vote of the members present when the vote is taken, conduct the hearing in lieu of appointing an administrative law judge.
(2) (a) (I) The board shall appoint an administrative law judge pursuant to part 10 of article 30 of title 24 to conduct any hearing concerning the licensing or discipline of a motor vehicle dealer, used motor vehicle dealer, wholesaler, buyer's agent, business disposer, or wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer; except that the board may, upon a unanimous vote of the members present when the vote is taken, conduct the hearing in lieu of appointing an administrative law judge.

Beginning July 1, 2008, the board shall issue an annual report to the executive director detailing the number of hearings held pursuant to this subsection (2)(a) and the number of the hearings conducted by the board. If the board conducts greater than forty percent of the hearings, the executive director shall analyze the hearing procedures and acts and issue a report to the general assembly, which shall include any recommendations of the executive director.

The board shall assign a hearing concerning the licensing or discipline of a motor vehicle salesperson to the executive director who shall appoint an officer to conduct a hearing.

Hearings conducted before an administrative law judge shall be in accordance with the rules of procedure of the office of administrative courts. Hearings conducted before an officer appointed by the executive director shall be in accordance with the rules of procedure established by the executive director.

The board may summarily suspend a licensee required to post a bond under this article 20 if the licensee does not have a bond in full force and effect as required by this article 20. The suspension shall become effective upon the earlier of the licensee receiving notice of the suspension or within three days after the notice of suspension is mailed to a licensee's last-known address on file with the board. The notice may be effected by certified mail or personal delivery.

The court of appeals shall have initial jurisdiction to review all final actions and orders that are subject to judicial review of the board. The proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with section 24-4-106 (11).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 70, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(2)(a)(I) amended, (SB 19-249), ch. 309, p. 2805, § 7, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-119 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-123. Sales activity following license denial, suspension, or revocation - unlawful act - penalty.

It is unlawful and a violation of this part 1 for any person whose motor vehicle dealer's, used motor vehicle dealer's, motor vehicle wholesaler's, business disposer's, or motor vehicle salesperson's license has been denied, suspended, or revoked to exercise any of the privileges of the license that was denied, suspended, or revoked.

A violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section shall be punishable in accordance with section 44-20-128; except that a second or subsequent violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section shall be a class 6 felony.

In any trial for a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section:

A duly authenticated copy of the board's order of denial, suspension, or revocation shall constitute prima facie evidence of the denial, suspension, or revocation;

A duly authenticated invoice, buyer's order, or other customary, written sales or purchase document or instrument proven to be signed by the defendant and indicating the defendant's role in the purchase or sale of a motor vehicle at any motor vehicle auction, wholesale motor vehicle sales location, or retail motor vehicle sales location, as applicable, shall constitute prima facie evidence of the defendant's exercise of a privilege of licensure;

It shall be an affirmative defense that the defendant bought or sold a motor vehicle that was, at all relevant times, intended for the defendant's own use and not bought or sold for the purpose of profit or gain; and

The fact that the defendant has a motor vehicle dealer's, used motor vehicle dealer's, motor vehicle wholesaler's, or motor vehicle salesperson's license, or any other license to buy and sell motor vehicles, that is issued by a state or jurisdiction other than Colorado shall not constitute a defense.

Upon the defendant's conviction by entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere or judgment or verdict of guilt in connection with a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section or of section 44-20-124 (2) or 42-6-142 (1), the court shall immediately give the executive director written notice of the conviction. In addition, the court shall forward to the executive director copies of documentation of any conviction on a lesser included offense and any amended charge, plea bargain, deferred prosecution, deferred sentence, or deferred judgment in connection with the original charge.

Upon receiving notice of a conviction or other disposition pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the executive director or his or her designee shall forward the notice to the board, which shall immediately examine its files to determine whether in fact the defendant's license was denied, suspended, or revoked at the time of the offense to which the conviction or other disposition relates. If in fact the defendant's license was denied, suspended, or revoked at the time of the offense, the board:

Shall not issue or reinstate any license to the defendant until one year after the time the defendant would otherwise have been eligible to receive a new or reinstated license; and

Shall revoke or suspend any other licenses held by the defendant until at least one year after the date of the conviction or other disposition.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 71, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 19-249), ch. 309, p. 2806, § 8, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-119.5 as it existed prior to 2018.